Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,109
(UTC 1102) Electronic records and signatures.

(UTC 1102) The provisions of the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7002, as such section existed on January 1 immediately preceding January 1, 2005, and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 109.